New Jersey, session 222, S3286.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the College Mental Health Services Act. 2.    a.  There is established in the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education the College Mental Health Services Grant Program.  The purpose of the program shall be to allocate grant moneys to public institutions of higher education to improve access to mental health services on the campuses of the institutions. b.    A grant received by a public institution of higher education under the program shall be specifically used for efforts to improve student access to, and the timeliness of the provision of, mental health services and supports.  The grant may be used for, but is not limited to: (1)  developing initiatives to reduce wait times for students seeking mental health services and supports; (2)  hiring additional mental health professionals to provide mental health services and supports to students at the institution; (3)  contracting with independent public or private entities to provide mental health services and supports; (4)  creating methods to enhance the identification of students who may be experiencing personal, school, or family difficulties impacting the students mental health;  and (5)  implementing efforts to increase awareness among students of existing on-campus and community resources for students experiencing mental health difficulties. c.     To be eligible for consideration for a grant award, a public institution of higher education shall submit an application to the Secretary of Higher Education, in accordance with application procedures and requirements prescribed by the secretary.  A grant application shall include a complete description of the institutions specific plans and objectives for the use of the grant funds and any other information specified by the secretary. d.    The secretary shall establish selection criteria for the awarding of grant funds under the program.  The secretary shall establish the amount for each grant that is approved. 3.    a.  There is created within the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education a fund to be known as the College Mental Health Services Grant Fund.  The fund shall be used to provide grants to New Jersey public institutions of higher education under the College Mental Health Services Grant Program established pursuant to section 2 of this act. b.    The fund shall annually be credited with moneys appropriated by the State, any moneys received by the State from corporate donors or other private sector support, and any federal funds which may become available for higher education and mental health services and supports purposes. 4.   a. Beginning with the first full academic year following the date of enactment of this act, a public institution of higher education shall provide for public inspection on its Internet website information on: (1)  the ratio of students to mental health professionals at the institution; (2)  the total number of students who had appointments with a mental health professional at the institution; (3)   the number of students who had only one appointment with a mental health professional at the institution; (4)  the number of students who had three or more appointments with a mental health professional at the institution; (5)  the total number of appointments made by students with mental health professionals at the institution; (6)  the average number of appointments for those students who had more than one appointment with a mental health professional at the institution; (7)  the average wait time for students to meet with a mental health professional at the institution; (8)  the number of students who were referred to outside mental health services; and (9)  the number of students who were referred to emergency care due to mental health concerns. The information required pursuant to this subsection shall be recorded for each semester and shall be posted no more than 60 days following the end of each semester.  The information shall be posted on the institutions Internet website in a prominent and easily accessible location. b. Beginning with the first full academic year following the date of enactment of this act, a public institution of higher education shall report to the Secretary of Higher Education on: (1)   the total number of students enrolled in the institution who committed suicide in the previous academic year; and (2)   the total number of students enrolled in the institution who attempted to commit suicide in the previous academic year. The secretary shall report the total number of student suicides and student suicide attempts at all public institutions of higher education combined to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1). The secretary may authorize limited disclosure of the data collected pursuant to this subsection for use in medical, academic, or policy studies. 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.